de: Vorgesehene Reparaturstelle: Inklusive Reifenpflaster für Seitenwand; Lauffläche und Schulter; Nur Lauffläche; Sonstige
zh-TW: 適用修補位置: 包含胎壁防護貼; 胎面與胎肩; 僅胎面; 其他
pt-PT: Local previsto para a reparação: Inclui suporte de reforço de flanco; Piso e ombro; Apenas piso; Outro
hr-HR: Predviđena lokacija popravka: Uključuje potporu za bočnicu; Gazni sloj i rame; Samo gazni sloj; Ostalo
bg-BG: Предвидено място за ремонт: Включва подсилване на страничния борд; Протектор и рамо; Само протектор; Други
lt-LT: Numatyta remonto vieta: Su šoninės sienelės atrama; Protektorius ir padangos petys; Tik protektorius; Kita
it: Sede di riparazione prevista: Include supporto per riparazione del fianco; Battistrada e spalla; Solo battistrada; Altro
sv: Avsedd reparationsplats: Inkluderar stöd för däcksida; Slitbana och däckskuldra; Endast slitbana; Annat
hu: Tervezett javítási helyszín: Oldalfalerősítést tartalmaz; Futófelület és váll; Csak futófelület; Egyéb
sk-SK: Zamýšľaná lokalita opravy: Obsahuje oporu na opravu bočnice; Behúň a rameno; Len behúň; Iné
pl: Przewidziana lokalizacja naprawy: Obejmuje wsparcie dla łatki ścianki bocznej; Bieżnik i bark opony; Tylko bieżnik; Inna
vi: Vị trí sửa chữa dự định: Bao gồm miếng dán hỗ trợ hông lốp; Mặt gai và vai lốp; Chỉ mặt gai lốp; Khác
cs: Místo zamýšlené opravy: Včetně podložky na opravu bočnice; Běhoun a rameno; Pouze běhoun; Jiné
en: Intended repair location: Includes sidewall boot support; Tread and shoulder; Tread only; Other
ja: 修理対象場所: サイドウォールブーツサポートを含む; トレッドおよびショルダー; トレッドのみ; その他
ro-RO: Locația de reparații prevăzută: Include suport pentru petic pe flanc; Bandă de rulare și umăr; Doar bandă de rulare; Altele
th: ตำแหน่งที่ต้องการซ่อมแซม: รวมการรองรับแก้มยาง; หน้ายางและไหล่ยาง; หน้ายางเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
nl: Beoogde reparatielocatie: Inclusief zijwandpleister; Loopvlak en schouder; Alleen loopvlak; Overig
ko: 수리 위치 용도: 사이드월 부트 지지대 포함; 트레드 및 숄더; 트레드 전용; 기타
fi: Suunniteltu korjauspaikka: Sisältää sivuseinän paikkalapun; Kulutuspinta ja olka; Vain kulutuspinta; Muu
pt-BR: Local de reparo pretendido: Inclui suporte de reparo lateral (boot); Banda de rodagem e ombro; Apenas banda de rodagem; Outro
sl-SI: Predvidena lokacija popravila: Vključuje ojačitev bočnice; Tekalna površina in rama; Samo tekalna površina; Drugo
ru: Предназначенное место ремонта: Включает поддержку корда боковины; Протектор и плечевая зона; Только протектор; Другое
fr: Emplacement de réparation prévu: Comprend un renfort de flanc; Bande de roulement et épaulement; Bande de roulement uniquement; Autre
da: Tilsigtet reparationssted: Inkluderer støtte til sidevæg; Slidbane og dækskulder; Kun slidbane; Andet
zh-CN: 适用维修位置: 包含胎侧补片支撑; 胎面和胎肩; 仅胎面; 其他
es: Lugar de reparación previsto: Incluye soporte de parche para pared lateral; Banda de rodadura y hombro; Solo banda de rodadura; Otra
nb: Tiltenkt reparasjonssted: Inkluderer dekkforsterkning til sidevegg; Slitebane og skulder; Kun slitebane; Annet
el: Προβλεπόμενο σημείο επισκευής στο ελαστικό: Περιλαμβάνει υποστήριξη πλευρικού τοιχώματος (boot); Πέλμα και ώμος; Μόνο πέλμα; Άλλο
tr: Amaçlanan onarım yeri: Yanak yama desteği içerir; Sırt ve omuz; Sadece sırt; Diğer